Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.050

Governing board.

(1) An authority shall be overseen by a board with not more than fourteen members. The authority board shall select the chair. Board members must have some experience with the mission of the authority. The board members shall be appointed as follows:

(a) The governor shall appoint three members;

(b) The county legislative authority in which the authority resides shall appoint three members;

(c) The mayor of the city in which the authority is created, or the mayor of the largest city within the authority if created by a county, shall appoint three members; and

(d) Up to five additional members may be appointed by the board.

(2) A simple majority of the board members shall constitute a quorum.

(3) The board shall annually elect a secretary and any other officers it deems necessary.

(4) The local government shall designate an individual with financial experience to serve as treasurer. The individual may be a city or county treasurer, city or county auditor, or a private party. If the treasurer is a private party, the local government shall require a bond in an amount and under such terms and conditions as the local government deems necessary to protect the authority. The treasurer shall have the power to create and maintain funds, issue warrants, and invest funds in its possession.

(5) The board may adopt bylaws or rules for their own governance.

(6) Meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or when a majority of the board so requests. Meetings of the board may be held at any location and board members may participate in a meeting of the board by means of a conference telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW 23B.08.200.

[ 2007 c 251 s 5.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—Severability—2007 c 251: See notes following RCW 35.104.010.